old/other/tt/hyph_tt_RU.dic
у1стә
у1сти
у1стү
у1сту
у1сту
у1сты
у1стү
у1стье
у1стьә
у1стью
у1стью
у1стья
у1стьә
у1стя
у1стә
у1су
у1су
у1сф
у1сф
у1сы
у1сү
у1сье
у1сьә
у1сью
у1сью
у1сья
у1сьә
у1сю
у1сю
у1та
у1та
у1те
у1тә
у1ти
у1тү
у1тл
у1тл
у1то
у1тө
у1ту
у1ту
у1ты
у1тү
у1тье
у1тьә
у1тью
у1тью
у1тья
у1тьә
у1тю
у1тю
у1тя
у1тә
у1у
у1у
у1фа
у1фа
у1фе
у1фә
у1фи
у1фү
у1фо
у1фө
у1фу
у1фу
у1фье
у1фьә
у1фьи
у1фьү
у1фью
у1фью
у1фья
у1фьә
у1ха
у1һа
у1хе
у1һә
у1хи
у1һү
у1хо
у1һө
у1ху
у1һу
у1ца
у1ца
у1це
у1цә
у1ци
у1цү
у1цу
у1цу
у1ча
у1ча
у1че
у1чә
у1чи
у1чү
у1чу
у1чу
у1чье
у1чьә
у1чьи
у1чьү
у1чью
у1чью
у1чья
у1чьә
у1ша
у1ша
у1ше
у1шә
у1ши
у1шү
у1шо
у1шө
у1шу
у1шу
у1шье
у1шьә
у1шьи
у1шьү
у1шью
у1шью
у1шья
у1шьә
у1ща
у1ща
у1ще
у1щә
у1щи
у1щү
у1що
у1щө
у1щу
у1щу
у1ю
у1ю
у1я
у1ә
у2б1р
у2б1р
у2д1р
у2д1р
у2ес
у2әс
у2х1р
у2һ1р
у2хв
у2һв
у2ш1лы
у2ш1лү
у4ныв
у4ңүв
у5ле
у5лә
у5мр
у5мр
у5ол
у5өл
у5шл
у5шл
у5э
у5э
у6але
у6алә
у6ас
у6ас
у6зел
у6зәл
у6трь
у6трь
уд2в
уд2в
уд2рс
уд2рс
уе1р
уә1р
уе2ди
уә2дү
уз5дю
уз5дю
ук1в
ук1в
ук5н
ук5ң
укос6
укөс6
уль1д
уль1д
ум1ног
ум1ңөһ
уо2к
уө2к
ур1в
ур1в
ус1ка
ус1ка
ус1ке
ус1кә
ус1ки
ус1кү
ус1ком
ус1көм
ус1ч
ус1ч
ус2кр
ус2кр
ус2по
ус2пө
ус5ков
ус5көв
ус5ку.
ус5ку.
ут5ла
ут5ла
уть6м
уть6м
уу2с
уу2с
ух1л
уһ1л
ух1м
уһ1м
ух1о2к
уһ1ө2к
уш3п
уш3п
уэ5ла
уэ5ла
уэ5ле
уэ5лә
уя2з
уә2з
ф1б
ф1б
ф1г
ф1һ
ф1к
ф1к
ф1м
ф1м
ф1т
ф1т
ф1ф
ф1ф
ф1ш
ф1ш
ф2узл
ф2узл
фа5у
фа5у
фаг1н
фаһ1ң
фар5в
фар5в
фе1д
фә1д
фе2д1р
фә2д1р
фе2с1к
фә2с1к
фени6
фәңү6
фи1д
фү1д
фи1с2к
фү1с2к
фи2дн
фү2дң
фи3о
фү3ө
фи6нин
фү6ңүң
фото1
фөтө1
фра5с
фра5с
фре2с1к
фрә2с1к
х1б
һ1б
х1д6
һ1д6
х1з
һ1з
х1к
һ1к
х1ли
һ1лү
х1ло.
һ1лө.
х1лу
һ1лу
х1лы
һ1лү
х1ля
һ1лә
х1ма
һ1ма
х1ми
һ1мү
х1н
һ1ң
х1осн
һ1өсң
х1п
һ1п
х1т
һ1т
х1у2ро
һ1у2рө
х1ф6
һ1ф6
х1х
һ1һ
х1ц
һ1ц
х1ш
һ1ш
х1э
һ1э
х2лип
һ2лүп
х2ляб
һ2ләб
х4ны
һ4ңү
х5ла.
һ5ла.
х5мет
һ5мәт
х5осм
һ5өсм
хе6о5
һә6ө5
хи2зы
һү2зү
хие2
һүә2
хо1тв
һө1тв
хо2пе
һө2пә
хоз1ар
һөз1ар
хри2п1л
һрү2п1л
хро2м1ч
һрө2м1ч
ц1б
ц1б
ц1д
ц1д
ц1н
ц1ң
ц1р
ц1р
ц1ц
ц1ц
ца2п1л
ца2п1л
це1д
цә1д
це2д1р
цә2д1р
цей6т5
цәй6т5
ци2к1л
цү2к1л
ци2ф1р
цү2ф1р
ч1в
ч1в
ч1н
ч1ң
ч1с
ч1с
ч1ч
ч1ч
ч1ш
ч1ш
ча2т1л
ча2т1л
чар3т
чар3т
част1в
част1в
чет1вер
чәт1вәр
чех1л
чәһ1л
чи2с1л
чү2с1л
чу2ж1д
чу2җ1д
ш1к
ш1к
ш1ля
ш1лә
ш1м
ш1м
ш1н
ш1ң
ш1с
ш1с
ш1ц
ш1ц
ш2кив
ш2күв
ш2лем
ш2ләм
ш2лют.
ш2лют.
ш2пр
ш2пр
ш5ч
ш5ч
ш6леш
ш6ләш
шаг1н
шаһ1ң
ше1с
шә1с
шео2
шәө2
ши2в1л
шү2в1л
ши2ф1р
шү2ф1р
ще1д
щә1д
ще1с
щә1с
ще2д1р
щә2д1р
щи2п3л
щү2п3л
ъ1я2
ъ1ә2
ъе2
ъә2
ъе3х
ъә3һ
ъем3н
ъәм3ң
ъю6с
ъю6с
ъю6т
ъю6т
ы1ба
ү1ба
ы1бе
ү1бә
ы1би
ү1бү
ы1бо
ү1бө
ы1бр
ү1бр
ы1бу
ү1бу
ы1бы
ү1бү
ы1бье
ү1бьә
ы1бьи
ү1бьү
ы1бью
ү1бью
ы1бья
ү1бьә
ы1бя
ү1бә
ы1ва
ү1ва
ы1ве
ү1вә
ы1ви
ү1вү
ы1во
ү1вө
ы1ву
ү1ву
ы1вы
ү1вү
ы1вя
ү1вә
ы1г
ү1һ
ы1га
ү1һа
ы1ге
ү1һә
ы1ги
ү1һү
ы1го
ү1һө
ы1гу
ү1һу
ы1да
ү1да
ы1дв
ү1дв
ы1де
ү1дә
ы1ди
ү1дү
ы1до
ү1дө
ы1ду
ү1ду
ы1ды
ү1дү
ы1дю
ү1дю
ы1дя
ү1дә
ы1е2
ү1ә2
ы1жа
ү1җа
ы1же
ү1җә
ы1жж
ү1җҗ
ы1жи
ү1җү
ы1жм
ү1җм
ы1жо
ү1җө
ы1жр
ү1җр
ы1жу
ү1җу
ы1за
ү1за
ы1зв
ү1зв
ы1зд
ү1зд
ы1зе
ү1зә
ы1зо
ү1зө
ы1зр
ү1зр
ы1зу
ү1зу
ы1зы
ү1зү
ы1зя
ү1зә
ы1и2
ү1ү2
ы1ка
ү1ка
ы1ке
ү1кә
ы1ки
ү1кү
ы1ко
ү1кө
ы1ку
ү1ку
ы1ла
ү1ла
ы1ле
ү1лә
ы1ли
ү1лү
ы1ло
ү1лө
ы1лу
ү1лу
ы1лы
ү1лү
ы1лье
ү1льә
ы1льи
ү1льү
ы1лья
ү1льә
ы1лю
ү1лю
ы1ля
ү1лә
ы1ма
ү1ма
ы1ме
ү1мә
ы1ми
ү1мү
ы1мо
ү1мө
ы1му
ү1му
ы1мы
ү1мү
ы1мя
ү1мә
ы1на
ү1ңа
ы1не
ү1ңә
ы1ни
ү1ңү
ы1но
ү1ңө
ы1ну
ү1ңу
ы1ны
ү1ңү
ы1нье
ү1ңьә
ы1ньи
ү1ңьү
ы1нью
ү1ңью
ы1нья
ү1ңьә
ы1ню
ү1ңю
ы1ня
ү1ңә
ы1па
ү1па
ы1пе
ү1пә
ы1пи
ү1пү
ы1по
ү1пө
ы1пу
ү1пу
ы1пы
ү1пү
ы1пье
ү1пьә
ы1пью
ү1пью
ы1пя
ү1пә
ы1ра
ү1ра
ы1рв
ү1рв
ы1ре
ү1рә
ы1ри
ү1рү
ы1ро
ү1рө
ы1ру
ү1ру
ы1ры
ү1рү
ы1рье
ү1рьә
ы1рью
ү1рью
ы1рья
ү1рьә
ы1рю
ү1рю
ы1ря
ү1рә
ы1са
ү1са
ы1се
ү1сә
ы1си
ү1сү
ы1со
ү1сө
ы1ст
ү1ст
ы1ста
ү1ста
ы1сте
ү1стә
ы1сти
ү1стү
ы1сту
ү1сту
ы1сты
ү1стү
ы1стью
ү1стью
ы1су
ү1су
ы1сы
ү1сү
ы1сье
ү1сьә
ы1сьи
ү1сьү
ы1сью
ү1сью
ы1сья
ү1сьә
ы1т6р
ү1т6р
ы1та
ү1та
ы1те
ү1тә
ы1ти
ү1тү
ы1то
ү1тө
ы1ту
ү1ту
ы1ты
ү1тү
ы1тье
ү1тьә
ы1тьи
ү1тьү
ы1тью
ү1тью
ы1тья
ү1тьә
ы1тя
ү1тә
ы1у2
ү1у2
ы1ха
ү1һа
ы1хе
ү1һә
ы1хи
ү1һү
ы1хо
ү1һө
ы1ху
ү1һу
ы1ц
ү1ц
ы1ца
ү1ца
ы1це
ү1цә
ы1ча
ү1ча
ы1че
ү1чә
ы1чи
ү1чү
ы1чу
ү1чу
ы1чье
ү1чьә
ы1чьи
ү1чьү
ы1чью
ү1чью
ы1чья
ү1чьә
ы1ша
ү1ша
ы1ше
ү1шә
ы1ши
ү1шү
ы1шо
ү1шө
ы1шу
ү1шу
ы1шью
ү1шью
ы1шья
ү1шьә
ы1ща
ү1ща
ы1ще
ү1щә
ы1щи
ү1щү
ы1що
ү1щө
ы1щу
ү1щу
ы1я2
ү1ә2
ы2з1вол
ү2з1вөл
ы2с1ку
ү2с1ку
ы5см
ү5см
ы6шн
ү6шң
ык1в
үк1в
ык5н
үк5ң
ым1ч
үм1ч
ып1ле
үп1лә
ыре2х
үрә2һ
ыс2мей
үс2мәй
ыс5ки
үс5кү
ыс6па
үс6па
ыс6пл
үс6пл
ыш1ле
үш1лә
ь1б
ь1б
ь1ва
ь1ва
ь1ве
ь1вә
ь1ви
ь1вү
ь1г
ь1һ
ь1де
ь1дә
ь1ди
ь1дү
ь1ж
ь1җ
ь1з
ь1з
ь1к
ь1к
ь1м
ь1м
ь1н
ь1ң
ь1п
ь1п
ь1с
ь1с
ь1т
ь1т
ь1х
ь1һ
ь1ч
ь1ч
ь1ш
ь1ш
ь1щ
ь1щ
ь1э
ь1э
ь2к1ло
ь2к1лө
ь2нул
ь2ңул
ь2сн
ь2сң
ь2сти
ь2стү
ь2стя
ь2стә
ь2ф1ра
ь2ф1ра
ь5дь
ь5дь
ь5дя
ь5дә
ь5фе
ь5фә
ь6зн
ь6зң
ь6зя.
ь6зә.
ь6мс
ь6мс
ь6ща
ь6ща
ь6ще
ь6щә
ь6щу
ь6щу
ьдо1
ьдө1
ьк5н
ьк5ң
ьти5с
ьтү5с
ьхо2
ьһө2
э1ля
э1лә
э1нь
э1ңь
э1о
э1ө
э1я
э1ә
э2д
э2д
э5зи
э5зү
э5ка
э5ка
э5ке
э5кә
э5лы
э5лү
э5ри
э5рү
э5ш
э5ш
э6в
э6в
э6ф
э6ф
эд1р
эд1р
эк1в
эк1в
эк1з
эк1з
эк1л
эк1л
эк2ск
эк2ск
экс1
экс1
экс2и
экс2ү
эль5
эль5
эро1
эрө1
эс1к
эс1к
эс2па
эс2па
эс5м
эс5м
ю1а
ю1а
ю1б
ю1б
ю1ба
ю1ба
ю1бе
ю1бә
ю1би
ю1бү
ю1бо
ю1бө
ю1бу
ю1бу
ю1бы
ю1бү
ю1бя
ю1бә
ю1ва
ю1ва
ю1ве
ю1вә
ю1ви
ю1вү
ю1во
ю1вө
ю1ву
ю1ву
ю1вы
ю1вү
ю1га
ю1һа
ю1ге
ю1һә
ю1ги
ю1һү
ю1го
ю1һө
ю1гу
ю1һу
ю1да
ю1да
ю1де
ю1дә
ю1ди
ю1дү
ю1до
ю1дө
ю1ду
ю1ду
ю1ды
ю1дү
ю1дью
ю1дью
ю1дя
ю1дә
ю1е
ю1ә
ю1жа
ю1җа
ю1же
ю1җә
ю1жи
ю1җү
ю1жо
ю1җө
ю1жу
ю1җу
ю1жье
ю1җьә
ю1жьи
ю1җьү
ю1жью
ю1җью
ю1жья
ю1җьә
ю1за
ю1за
ю1зе
ю1зә
ю1зи
ю1зү
ю1зо
ю1зө
ю1зу
ю1зу
ю1зы
ю1зү
ю1зю
ю1зю
ю1зя
ю1зә
ю1и
ю1ү
ю1ка
ю1ка
ю1ке
ю1кә
ю1ки
ю1кү
ю1ко
ю1кө
ю1ку
ю1ку
ю1ла
ю1ла
ю1ле
ю1лә
ю1ло
ю1лө
ю1лу
ю1лу
ю1лы
ю1лү
ю1лю
ю1лю
ю1ля
ю1лә
ю1ма
ю1ма
ю1ме
ю1мә
ю1ми
ю1мү
ю1мо
ю1мө
ю1му
ю1му
ю1мы
ю1мү
ю1на
ю1ңа
ю1не
ю1ңә
ю1ни
ю1ңү
ю1но
ю1ңө
ю1ну
ю1ңу
ю1ны
ю1ңү
ю1ню
ю1ңю
ю1ня
ю1ңә
ю1о
ю1ө
ю1па
ю1па
ю1пи
ю1пү
ю1по
ю1пө
ю1ра
ю1ра
ю1ре
ю1рә
ю1ри
ю1рү
ю1ро
ю1рө
ю1ру
ю1ру
ю1ры
ю1рү
ю1рю
ю1рю
ю1ря
ю1рә
ю1са
ю1са
ю1се
ю1сә
ю1со
ю1сө
ю1ста
ю1ста
ю1сте
ю1стә
ю1сти
ю1стү
ю1стр
ю1стр
ю1сту
ю1сту
ю1сты
ю1стү
ю1стью
ю1стью
ю1стя
ю1стә
ю1су
ю1су
ю1сы
ю1сү
ю1сю
ю1сю
ю1та
ю1та
ю1те
ю1тә
ю1ти
ю1тү
ю1то
ю1тө
ю1ту
ю1ту
ю1ты
ю1тү
ю1тя
ю1тә
ю1фа
ю1фа
ю1фе
ю1фә
ю1фя
ю1фә
ю1ха
ю1һа
ю1хе
ю1һә
ю1хи
ю1һү
ю1хо
ю1һө
ю1ху
ю1һу
ю1це
ю1цә
ю1ци
ю1цү
ю1ша
ю1ша
ю1ше
ю1шә
ю1ши
ю1шү
ю1шо
ю1шө
ю1шу
ю1шу
ю1ща
ю1ща
ю1ще
ю1щә
ю1щи
ю1щү
ю1що
ю1щө
ю1щу
ю1щу
ю1ю
ю1ю
ю1я
ю1ә
ю2бч
ю2бч
ю2д1ж
ю2д1җ
ю2ли
ю2лү
ю2с1к
ю2с1к
юй2д1
юй2д1
юйдо6
юйдө6
юк1з
юк1з
юк1н
юк1ң
юм1н
юм1ң
юмини5
юмүңү5
я1ба
ә1ба
я1бе
ә1бә
я1би
ә1бү
я1бо
ә1бө
я1бр
ә1бр
я1бу
ә1бу
я1бы
ә1бү
я1бью
ә1бью
я1бя
ә1бә
я1ва
ә1ва
я1ве
ә1вә
я1ви
ә1вү
я1во
ә1вө
я1ву
ә1ву
я1вы
ә1вү
я1вью
ә1вью
я1вя
ә1вә
я1га
ә1һа
я1ге
ә1һә
я1ги
ә1һү
я1го
ә1һө
я1гу
ә1һу
я1да
ә1да
я1де
ә1дә
я1ди
ә1дү
я1до
ә1дө
я1ду
ә1ду
я1ды
ә1дү
я1дью
ә1дью
я1дю
ә1дю
я1дя
ә1дә
я1е
ә1ә
я1жа
ә1җа
я1же
ә1җә
я1жи
ә1җү
я1жо
ә1җө
я1жу
ә1җу
я1жье
ә1җьә
я1жьи
ә1җьү
я1жью
ә1җью
я1жья
ә1җьә
я1за
ә1за
я1зе
ә1зә
я1зи
ә1зү
я1зо
ә1зө
я1зу
ә1зу
я1зы
ә1зү
я1зью
ә1зью
я1зья
ә1зьә
я1зю
ә1зю
я1зя
ә1зә
я1и
ә1ү
я1ка
ә1ка
я1ке
ә1кә
я1ки
ә1кү
я1ко
ә1кө
я1ку
ә1ку
я1ла
ә1ла
я1ле
ә1лә
я1ли
ә1лү
я1ло
ә1лө
я1лу
ә1лу
я1лы
ә1лү
я1лю
ә1лю
я1ля
ә1лә
я1ма
ә1ма
я1ме
ә1мә
я1ми
ә1мү
я1мо
ә1мө
я1му
ә1му
я1мы
ә1мү
я1мя
ә1мә
я1на
ә1ңа
я1не
ә1ңә
я1ни
ә1ңү
я1но
ә1ңө
я1ну
ә1ңу
я1ны
ә1ңү
я1нье
ә1ңьә
я1ньи
ә1ңьү
я1нью
ә1ңью
я1нья
ә1ңьә
я1ню
ә1ңю
я1ня
ә1ңә
я1па
ә1па
я1пе
ә1пә
я1пи
ә1пү
я1по
ә1пө
я1пу
ә1пу
я1пы
ә1пү
я1пье
ә1пьә
я1пью
ә1пью
я1пья
ә1пьә
я1пя
ә1пә
я1ра
ә1ра
я1ре
ә1рә
я1ри
ә1рү
я1ро
ә1рө
я1ру
ә1ру
я1ры
ә1рү
я1рье
ә1рьә
я1рью
ә1рью
я1рья
ә1рьә
я1ря
ә1рә
я1са
ә1са
я1се
ә1сә
я1си
ә1сү
я1со
ә1сө
я1ста
ә1ста
я1сти
ә1стү
я1сту
ә1сту
я1сты
ә1стү
я1стье
ә1стьә
я1стью
ә1стью
я1стья
ә1стьә
я1су
ә1су
я1сы
ә1сү
я1та
ә1та
я1те
ә1тә
я1то
ә1тө
я1ту
ә1ту
я1ты
ә1тү
я1тье
ә1тьә
я1тью
ә1тью
я1тья
ә1тьә
я1тю
ә1тю
я1тя
ә1тә
я1у
ә1у
я1ха
ә1һа
я1хе
ә1һә
я1хи
ә1һү
я1хо
ә1һө
я1ху
ә1һу
я1ца
ә1ца
я1це
ә1цә
я1ци
ә1цү
я1цу
ә1цу
я1ча
ә1ча
я1че
ә1чә
я1чи
ә1чү
я1чу
ә1чу
я1чье
ә1чьә
я1чьи
ә1чьү
я1чью
ә1чью
я1чья
ә1чьә
я1ша
ә1ша
я1ше
ә1шә
я1ши
ә1шү
я1шо
ә1шө
я1шу
ә1шу
я1ща
ә1ща
я1ще
ә1щә
я1щи
ә1щү
я1що
ә1щө
я1щу
ә1щу
я1ю
ә1ю
я1я
ә1ә
я2в1л
ә2в1л
я5стр
ә5стр
я5ти
ә5тү
яг1л
әһ1л
яг5н
әһ5ң
яз1в
әз1в
як1н
әк1ң
яс1к
әс1к
яс6т
әс6т
ят1в
әт1в
ях1ле
әһ1лә
